nl: Ruit glas kenmerken: Geschikt voor head-up display (HUD); Verwarmde ruitenwisser-rustplaats; Beugel voor rijstrookassistent-/ADAS-camera; Geen; Geschikt voor regensensor; Overige
nb: Vindusglassets egenskaper: HUD-kompatibel (Heads-up display); Oppvarmet viskerområde; Brakett for filskifte-/ADAS-kamera; Ingen; Kompatibel med regnsensor; Annet
lt-LT: Langų stiklo savybės: Suderinamas su HUD ekranu; Šildoma valytuvų zona; Nukrypimo nuo eismo juostos / ADAS kameros laikiklis; Nėra; Suderinamas su lietaus jutikliu; Kita
cs: Vlastnosti okenního skla: Kompatibilní s průhledovým displejem (HUD); Vyhřívané parkovací místo stěračů; Držák kamery pro varování před opuštěním pruhu / ADAS; Žádné; Kompatibilní s dešťovým senzorem; Jiné
fi: Ikkunalasin ominaisuudet: HUD-näytön kanssa yhteensopiva; Lämmitetty pyyhkijöiden lepoalue; Kaistavahdin/ADAS-kameran kiinnike; Ei mitään; Sadetunnistimen kanssa yhteensopiva; Muu
tr: Pencere camı özellikleri: Hayalet gösterge (HUD) uyumlu; Isıtmalı silecek park alanı; Şerit takip/ADAS kamera braketi; Yok; Yağmur sensörü uyumlu; Diğer
pt-PT: Funcionalidades do vidro da janela: Compatível com Heads-up display (HUD); Área de repouso dos limpa-para-brisas aquecida; Suporte de câmara para saída de faixa/ADAS; Nenhum; Compatível com sensor de chuva; Outro
fr: Fonctions du vitrage: Compatible avec affichage tête haute (HUD); Zone de repos des essuie-glaces chauffante; Support de caméra d’alerte de franchissement de ligne/ADAS; Aucun; Compatible avec détecteur de pluie; Autre
th: คุณสมบัติของกระจกหน้าต่าง: รองรับจอแสดงผลบนกระจกหน้า (HUD); ระบบไล่ฝ้าบริเวณที่พักปัดน้ำฝน; ขายึดกล้องระบบเตือนออกนอกเลน/ADAS; ไม่มี; รองรับเซ็นเซอร์ปัดน้ำฝน; อื่นๆ
pl: Cechy szyby: Zgodność z wyświetlaczem HUD; Podgrzewana strefa wycieraczek; Wspornik kamery asystenta pasa ruchu/ADAS; Brak; Zgodność z czujnikiem deszczu; Inne
zh-CN: 车窗玻璃特征: 兼容平视显示器 (HUD); 雨刮器停放区加热; 车道偏离/ADAS 摄像头支架; 无; 兼容雨量传感器; 其他
pt-BR: Vidro de janela recursos: Compatível com head-up display (HUD); Área de repouso das palhetas aquecida; Suporte para câmera de saída de faixa/ADAS; Nenhum; Compatível com sensor de chuva; Outro
vi: Đặc điểm kính cửa sổ: Tương thích màn hình hiển thị trên kính lái (HUD); Vùng nghỉ cần gạt nước có sưởi; Giá gắn camera cảnh báo chệch làn đường/ADAS; Không có; Tương thích cảm biến gạt mưa; Khác
hu: Ablaküveg jellemzői: Head-up display (HUD) kompatibilis; Fűthető ablaktörlő-pihenő; Sávelhagyás-jelző / ADAS kamerakonzol; Nincs; Esőszenzor-kompatibilis; Egyéb
ro-RO: Caracteristicile geamului: Compatibil cu afișajul pe parbriz (HUD); Zonă de repaus ștergătoare încălzită; Suport cameră asistență părăsire bandă/ADAS; Fără; Compatibil cu senzor de ploaie; Altele
es: Características del vidrio de la ventana: Compatible con pantalla frontal (HUD); Área de reposo de limpiaparabrisas con calefacción; Soporte de cámara para salida de carril/ADAS; Ninguno; Compatible con sensor de lluvia; Otro
sl-SI: Značilnosti okenskega stekla: Združljivo s prosojnim zaslonom (HUD); Ogrevano območje za brisalce; Nosilec za kamero ADAS/za menjavo pasu; Brez; Združljivo s senzorjem za dež; Drugo
zh-TW: 車窗玻璃功能: 抬頭顯示器 (HUD) 相容; 雨刷靜止區加熱功能; 車道偏離/ADAS 攝影機支架; 無; 雨滴感測器相容; 其他
ru: Функции автомобильного стекла: Совместимость с проекционным дисплеем (HUD); Обогрев зоны покоя стеклоочистителей; Кронштейн для камеры удержания в полосе / ADAS; Нет; Совместимость с датчиком дождя; Другое
hr-HR: Karakteristike prozorskog stakla: Kompatibilno sa sustavom HUD (Heads-up display); Grijano područje brisača; Nosač kamere za ADAS / napuštanje trake; Nijedno; Kompatibilno sa senzorom za kišu; Ostalo
el: Χαρακτηριστικά τζαμιού παραθύρων: Συμβατό με Heads-up display (HUD); Θερμαινόμενη περιοχή υαλοκαθαριστήρων; Βάση κάμερας αλλαγής λωρίδας/ADAS; Κανένα; Συμβατό με αισθητήρα βροχής; Άλλο
ja: 窓ガラスの特徴: ヘッドアップディスプレイ (HUD) 対応; ワイパー待機部ヒーター; 車線逸脱/ADASカメラブラケット; なし; レインセンサー対応; その他
it: Caratteristiche del vetro dei finestrini: Compatibile con display head-up (HUD); Area di sosta tergicristalli riscaldata; Staffa per telecamera di mantenimento corsia/ADAS; Nessuna; Compatibile con sensore pioggia; Altro
en: Window glass features: Heads-up display (HUD) compatible; Heated wiper park area; Lane departure/ADAS camera bracket; None; Rain sensor compatible; Other
ko: 창유리 특징: 헤드업 디스플레이(HUD) 호환; 열선 와이퍼 결빙 방지 구역; 차선 이탈/ADAS 카메라 브래킷; 없음; 레인 센서 호환; 기타
sv: Fönsterglas – specifikation: Kompatibel med head-up-display (HUD); Uppvärmd parkeringsyta för torkare; Fäste för filbytesvarnare/ADAS-kamera; Inga; Kompatibel med regnsensor; Övrigt
sk-SK: Vlastnosti okenného skla: Kompatibilné s priehľadovým displejom (HUD); Vyhrievaná oblasť stieračov; Držiak kamery na sledovanie jazdného pruhu/ADAS; Žiadne; Kompatibilné s dažďovým senzorom; Iné
bg-BG: Характеристики на стъклото на прозорците: Съвместимо с head-up дисплей (HUD); Отопляема зона на чистачките; Скоба за камера за напускане на лентата/ADAS; Няма; Съвместимо със сензор за дъжд; Друго
de: Merkmale des Fensterglases: Kompatibel mit Head-up-Display (HUD); Beheizbare Wischerablage; Halterung für Spurhalteassistent/ADAS-Kamera; Keine; Kompatibel mit Regensensor; Sonstige
da: Funktioner i bilrude: Kompatibel med Heads-up display (HUD); Opvarmet hvileområde til viskere; Beslag til kamera for vognbaneassistent/ADAS; Ingen; Kompatibel med regnsensor; Andet